Utah statutes.
73-4-18.   General determination in court's discretion -- State to be made a
party.
Whenever any civil action is commenced in the district court involving fewer
than ten water claimants or less than the major part of the rights to the use
of water from any river system, lake, underground water basin, or other
source, the court in its discretion may, if a general determination of the
rights to the use of water from said water source has not already been made,
proceed, as in this chapter provided, to make such a general determination. In
any such action for the determination of water rights the state of Utah shall
be joined as a necessary party.
